Washington statutes.
RCW 7.88.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Affiliate" means any person that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with a financial institution.

(2) "Civil action" means a civil proceeding pending in a court or other adjudicatory tribunal with jurisdiction to issue a request or subpoena for records, including a voluntary or mandated alternative dispute resolution mechanism under which a party may compel the production of records. "Civil action" does not include an examination or enforcement proceeding initiated by a governmental agency with primary regulatory jurisdiction over a financial institution in possession of a compliance review document.

(3) "Compliance review personnel" means a person or persons assigned and directed by the board of directors or management of a financial institution or affiliate to conduct a compliance review, and any person engaged or assigned by compliance review personnel or by the board of directors or management to assist in a compliance review.

(4) "Compliance review" means a self-critical analysis conducted by compliance review personnel to test, review, or evaluate past conduct, transactions, policies, or procedures for the purpose of confidentially (a) ascertaining, monitoring, or remediating violations of applicable state and federal statutes, rules, regulations, or mandatory policies, statements, or guidelines, (b) assessing and improving loan quality, loan underwriting standards, or lending practices, or (c) assessing and improving financial reporting to federal or state regulatory agencies.

(5) "Compliance review document" means any record prepared or created by compliance review personnel in connection with a compliance review. "Compliance review document" includes any documents created or data generated in the course of conducting a compliance review, but does not include other underlying documents, data, or factual materials that are the subject of, or source materials for, the compliance review, including any documents in existence prior to the commencement of the compliance review that are not themselves compliance review documents related to a past compliance review.

(6) "Financial institution" means a bank, trust company, mutual savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union authorized by federal or state law to accept deposits in this state.

(7) "Person" means an individual, group, committee, partnership, firm, association, corporation, limited liability company, or other entity, including a financial institution or affiliate and its agents, employees, legal counsel, auditors, and consultants.

[ 1997 c 435 s 2.]